Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1215.5] Promoting minor-produced
sexual images in the first degree. (1) A person, eighteen years of age or
older, commits the offense of promoting minor-produced sexual images in the
first degree if the person intentionally or knowingly commands, requests, or
encourages a minor to use a computer, cell phone, or any other device capable
of electronic data transmission or distribution, to transmit to any person a
nude photograph or video of a minor.

(2) For purposes of this section, a
"minor" means any person under eighteen years of age.

(3) Promoting minor-produced sexual images in
the first degree is a misdemeanor. [L 2012, c 213, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next